Alabama, session 2026rs, SB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
23 Section 1. Section 39-2-2, Code of Alabama 1975, as
24 last amended by Act 2025-383, 2025 Regular Session, is amended
25 to read as follows:
26 "§39-2-2
27 (a)(1) Before entering into any contract for a public
28 works involving an amount in excess of one hundred thousand
Page 1

works involving an amount in excess of one hundred thousand
SB14 INTRODUCED
29 dollars ($100,000), the awarding authority shall advertise for
30 sealed bids, except as provided in subsection (k).
31 (2)a. If the awarding authority is the state, a county,
32 or an instrumentality thereof, it shall advertise for sealed
33 bids at least once each week for three consecutive weeks in a
34 newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in
35 which the improvement, or some part thereof, is to be made.
36 b.1. If the awarding authority is a municipality, or an
37 instrumentality thereof, it shall advertise for sealed bids at
38 least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in
39 the municipality where the awarding authority is located.
40 2. If no newspaper is published in the municipality,
41 the awarding authority shall advertise by posting notice
42 thereof on a bulletin board maintained outside the purchasing
43 office and in any other manner and for the length of time as
44 may be determined. In addition to bulletin board notice, the
45 awarding authority shall also send the notice by U.S. mail or
46 electronic mail to the Department of Finance for publication
47 of the advertisement on the centralized website maintained by
48 the department as further described in subsection (c).
49 (3) The advertisements shall briefly describe the
50 improvement, state that plans and specifications for the
51 improvement are on file for examination in a designated office
52 of the awarding authority, state the procedure for obtaining
53 plans and specifications, state the time and place in which
54 bids shall be received and opened, and identify whether
55 prequalification is required and where all written
56 prequalification information is available for review.
Page 2

prequalification information is available for review.
SB14 INTRODUCED
57 (4) All bids shall be opened publicly at the advertised
58 time and place.
59 (5) No public work involving a sum in excess of one
60 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be split into parts
61 involving sums of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or
62 less for the purpose of evading the requirements of this
63 section.
64 (b)(1) An awarding authority may let contracts for
65 public works involving one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
66 or less with or without advertising or sealed bids.
67 (2) Notwithstanding the advertising requirements of
68 subdivision (a)(2), an awarding authority may enter into a
69 contract for public works if: (i) the awarding authority
70 submitted the advertisement for sealed bids for the contract
71 in accordance with subdivision (a)(2); and (ii) the
72 advertisement was published for at least three weeks, or if
73 the awarding authority is a municipality or instrumentality
74 thereof for at least seven consecutive calendar days, on a
75 centralized website maintained by the Department of Finance as
76 further described in subsection (c).
77 (3) If the awarding authority under subdivision (2) is
78 the Department of Transportation, the Department of Finance
79 may alternatively satisfy the requirements of subdivision
80 (2)(ii) by publishing the advertisement on its publicly
81 accessible website for at least three weeks.
82 (4) If the awarding authority under subdivision (2) is
83 a county or instrumentality thereof, the county or
84 instrumentality may alternatively satisfy the requirements of
Page 3

instrumentality may alternatively satisfy the requirements of
SB14 INTRODUCED
85 subdivision (2)(ii) by publishing the advertisement in
86 accordance with the procedures submitted by the Association of
87 County Engineers of Alabama and approved by the Department of
88 Examiners of Public Accounts as authorized by general law.
89 (c) The Department of Finance shall establish and
90 maintain a centralized website or digital platform to provide
91 publicly accessible notice of advertisements for sealed bids
92 pursuant to this section. The department may further provide
93 for the administration and operations related thereto by the
94 adoption of administrative rules, including, but not limited
95 to, the assessment of fees to awarding authorities for the
96 posting of advertisements to cover the implementation and
97 maintenance cost of the website or digital platform.
98 (d) All contracts for public works entered into in
99 violation of this title shall be void and violative of public
100 policy. Anyone who willfully violates this chapter concerning
101 public works shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
102 (e)(1) Excluded from the operation of this title shall
103 be contracts Contracts with persons who shall perform only
104 architectural, engineering, construction management, program
105 management, or project management services in support of the
106 public works and who shall do not engage in actual
107 construction, repair, renovation, or maintenance of the public
108 works with their own forces, by contract, subcontract,
109 purchase order, lease, or otherwise are excluded from the
110 operation of this title.
111 (2)a. Excluded from operation of the bidding
112 requirements in this title are contracts Contracts for the
Page 4

requirements in this title are contracts Contracts for the
SB14 INTRODUCED
113 purchase of any heating or air conditioning units or systems
114 by any awarding authority subject to Chapter 13B of Title 16;,
115 Article 3, commencing with Section 41-16-50 of Chapter 16 of
116 Title 41;, or Article 5, commencing with Section 41-4-110 of
117 Chapter 4 of Title 41, are excluded from the operation of this
118 title; provided, the contract is entered into with an Alabama
119 vendor who has been granted approved vendor status for the
120 sale of heating or air conditioning units or systems as a part
121 of a purchasing cooperative, and each of the following occur:
122 1. The heating or air conditioning unit or system being
123 purchased is available as a result of a competitive bid
124 process conducted by a governmental entity which has been
125 approved by the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts.
126 2. The purchase of the heating or air conditioning unit
127 or system is not available on the state purchasing program at
128 the time or the purchase under the purchasing cooperative is
129 available at a price that is equal to or less than that
130 available through the state purchasing program.
131 3. The entity entering into the contract for the
132 purchase of the heating or air conditioning unit or system has
133 been notified by the Department of Examiners of Public
134 Accounts that the competitive bid process utilized by the
135 cooperative program offering the goods complies with this
136 subdivision.
137 4. Upon request, the vendor has provided the purchasing
138 entity with a report of sales made under this subdivision
139 during the previous 12-month period, to include a general
140 description of the heating or air conditioning units and
Page 5

description of the heating or air conditioning units and
SB14 INTRODUCED
141 systems sold, the number of units sold per entity, and the
142 purchase price of the units.
143 b. The exemption from the requirement to use sealed
144 bids for the purchase of heating or air conditioning units or
145 systems authorized by this section shall not serve to exempt
146 any public works project from the remaining provisions of this
147 chapter, including, but not limited to, design, installation,
148 and review requirements, compliance with all applicable codes,
149 laws, specifications, and standards, and the compensation of
150 engineers, architects, or others as mandated by state law or
151 rule.
152 (f)(1) In case of an emergency for which a delay in
153 remedying would cause immediate harm to a person or public
154 property, contracts may be let to the extent necessary to meet
155 the emergency without public advertisement or bidding.
156 (2) In case of an emergency affecting public health,
157 safety, or convenience, as declared in writing by the awarding
158 authority, setting forth the nature of the danger to the
159 public health, safety, or convenience which would result from
160 delay, contracts may be let to the extent necessary to meet
161 the emergency without public advertisement.
162 (3) Any action taken under subdivision (1) or (2), and
163 the reasons for the action taken, shall immediately be made
164 public by the awarding authority and published in writing.
165 (g) No awarding authority may specify in the plans and
166 specifications for the improvement the use of materials,
167 products, systems, or services by a sole source unless all of
168 the following requirements are met:
Page 6

the following requirements are met:
SB14 INTRODUCED
169 (1) Except for contracts involving the construction,
170 reconstruction, renovation, or replacement of public roads,
171 bridges, and water and sewer facilities, the awarding
172 authority can document to the satisfaction of the Division of
173 Real Property Management of the Department of Finance, or in
174 the case of an educational institution or state educational
175 institution as provided pursuant to Sections 41-4-353 and
176 41-4-400, to the satisfaction of its governing board, that the
177 sole source product, material, system, or service is of an
178 indispensable nature for the improvement, that there are no
179 other viable alternatives, and that only this particular
180 product, material, system, or service fulfills the function
181 for which it is needed.
182 (2) The sole source specification has been recommended
183 by the architect or engineer of record as an indispensable
184 item for which there is no other viable alternative.
185 (3) All information substantiating the use of a sole
186 source specification, including the recommendation of the
187 architect or engineer of record, shall be documented and made
188 available for examination in the office of the awarding
189 authority at the time of advertisement for sealed bids.
190 (h) If a proposed public works project is acknowledged
191 in writing by the Alabama Homeland Security Department as: (i)
192 having a direct impact on the security or safety of persons or
193 facilities; and (ii) requiring confidential handling for the
194 protection of such persons or facilities, contracts may be let
195 without public advertisement but with the taking of informal
196 bids otherwise consistent with the requirements of this title
Page 7

bids otherwise consistent with the requirements of this title
SB14 INTRODUCED
197 and the requirements of maintaining confidentiality. Records
198 of bidding and award shall not be disclosed to the public and
199 shall remain confidential.
200 (i) If a pre-bid meeting is held, the pre-bid meeting
201 shall be held at least seven days prior to the bid opening
202 except when the project has been declared an emergency in
203 accordance with subsection (f).
204 (j) The awarding authority may not offer a contract for
205 bidding unless confirmation of any applicable grant has been
206 received and any required matching funds have been secured by
207 or are available to the awarding authority.
208 (k) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Department of
209 Transportation may enter into contracts for road construction
210 or road maintenance projects that do not involve more than two
211 hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) without advertising
212 for sealed bids, provided the project is listed on the
213 publicly accessible website of the department for at least
214 seven calendar days before entering into the contract. The
215 total cost of all projects not subject to advertising and
216 sealed bids pursuant to this subsection may not exceed one
217 million dollars ($1,000,000) in the aggregate per year.
218 (l) For the purposes of this chapter, sealed bids may
219 also be solicited and submitted through electronic means
220 including, but not limited to, electrical, digital, magnetic,
221 optical, electromagnetic, or any other similar technology,
222 provided that the awarding authority adopts rules and policies
223 to ensure that all electronic submissions are transmitted
224 securely and bids remained sealed until bid opening.
Page 8

securely and bids remained sealed until bid opening.
SB14 INTRODUCED
225 (m)(1)a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
226 any entity subject to this chapter that which is an awarding
227 authority of a contract for public works, by resolution or
228 board action, may purchase materials or equipment and may
229 install those materials or equipment, pursuant to: (i)
230 Division 7, Article 5, Chapter 4 of Title 41; (ii) Section
231 41-16-51(a)(14), (16), (17), (18), or (19); or (iii) Section
232 16-13B-2(a)(13) or (15), even when those materials or
233 equipment are otherwise part of the contract for public works
234 subject to the requirements of this title.
235 b. The installation of materials or equipment pursuant
236 to Section 16-13B-2(a)(13) or (15) are subject to each of the
237 following requirements:
238 1. The installation must require a design professional
239 for plans when the services of a professional architect are
240 required pursuant to Section 34-2-32 or the services of a
241 professional engineer are required pursuant to Section
242 34-11-2.
243 2. The installation must meet the requirements for code
244 compliance in Section 16-1-2.4(b).
245 3. The installation is subject to the bond requirements
246 of Section 39-1-1(a).
247 4. The contract is competitively awarded as a result of
248 a competitive bid process approved by the Department of
249 Examiners of Public Accounts.
250 5. The subcontractor performing the installation is an
251 Alabama licensed contractor.
252 (2) Except for the purchase and installation of those
Page 9

(2) Except for the purchase and installation of those
SB14 INTRODUCED
253 materials or equipment described in subdivision (1), the
254 remaining portion of the public works project shall be subject
255 to the requirements of this title, even if the remaining
256 portion would involve an amount less than one hundred thousand
257 dollars ($100,000) as a result of the exclusion of the
258 purchase of the materials or equipment as described in
259 subdivision (1)."
260 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
261 1, 2026.
Page 10